Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.100

Boards of trustees—Generally.

There is hereby created a board of trustees for each college district as set forth in this chapter. Each board of trustees shall be composed of five trustees, except as provided in RCW 28B.50.102, who shall be appointed by the governor for terms commencing October 1st of the year in which appointed. In making such appointments, the governor shall give consideration to geographical diversity, and representing labor, business, women, and racial and ethnic minorities, in the membership of the boards of trustees. The boards of trustees for districts containing technical colleges shall include at least one member from business and one member from labor.

The successors of the trustees initially appointed shall be appointed by the governor to serve for a term of five years except that any person appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of any term shall be appointed only for the remainder of the term. Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed and qualified.

Every trustee shall be a resident and qualified elector of the college district. No trustee may be an employee of the community and technical college system, a member of the board of directors of any school district, or a member of the governing board of any public or private educational institution.

Each board of trustees shall organize itself by electing a chair from its members. The board shall adopt a seal and may adopt such bylaws, rules, and regulations as it deems necessary for its own government. Three members of the board shall constitute a quorum, but a lesser number may adjourn from time to time and may compel the attendance of absent members in such manner as prescribed in its bylaws, rules, or regulations. The district president, or if there be none, the president of the college, shall serve as, or may designate another person to serve as, the secretary of the board, who shall not be deemed to be a member of the board.

Each board of trustees shall follow procedures for open public meetings in chapter 42.30 RCW. Each board shall provide time for public comment at each meeting.

Members of the boards of trustees may be removed for misconduct or malfeasance in office in the manner provided by RCW 28B.10.500.

[ 2013 c 23 s 58. Prior: 2012 c 228 s 5; 2012 c 148 s 2; 2011 c 336 s 739; 1991 c 238 s 37; 1987 c 330 s 1001; 1983 c 224 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 103 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 282 s 2; 1973 c 62 s 17; 1969 ex.s. c 261 s 22; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.100; prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 10.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2012 c 148: "The legislature finds that decisions made by governing boards of each respective institution greatly impact the lives of students and that student participation in the decision-making process can provide insight into the impacts of actions by trustees that are not always measurable through reports and statistics. Students are on campus every day using services and experiencing aspects of the institution that board members may only see on paper, providing a unique and valuable perspective that should not be overlooked.

Students serving on governing boards of higher education have proven effective in Washington and in over thirty other states. For over ten years students at Washington's four-year institutions of higher education have served as voting members on the board of trustees, regents, and the *higher education coordinating board, providing greater depth in board deliberations and a well-educated conduit for students to voice ideas and concerns.

The student perspective at community colleges also brings the board closer to their community. Student populations at community colleges are the most diverse of any institution of higher education in the state. Being on campus and in class every day, students are exposed to a more diverse group than any member of the board representing any one group of the community.

Student positions on governing boards are also a valuable tool for developing leadership through experiential learning. Student members learn processes of institutional governance, become involved in campus projects, analyze policy proposals, and participate in board discussions and decision making.

It is the intent of the legislature to enhance community college governance by fostering a more dynamic relationship between students and institutions through the encouragement of student participation in policy development and decision making at the district and state level." [ 2012 c 148 s 1.]

*Reviser's note: The higher education coordinating board was abolished by 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 301, effective July 1, 2012.

Construction—Application of rules—Severability—1987 c 330: See notes following RCW 28B.12.050.

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 103: See note following RCW 28B.20.100.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28B.50.870.

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 282 ss 2, 3: "Sections 2 and 3 of this 1977 amendatory act shall not take effect until January 1, 1978." [ 1977 ex.s. c 282 s 9.]

Savings—Severability—1973 c 62: See notes following RCW 28B.10.510.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 261: See note following RCW 28B.50.020.

Chief executive officer as secretary of board: RCW 28B.50.130.